Wyoming statutes. Title 5 Courts
Article 2. Clerk

Cross references. —

As to duties prescribed for clerks of district courts applying to clerk of supreme court, see §

5-7-107

.

As to appointment and duties of clerk, see art. 5, § 9, Wyo. Const.

For duty of clerk or judge of court to notify division of revenue and taxation of unsatisfied judgments after 30 days, under the Motor Vehicle Safety-Responsibility Act, see §

31-9-301

.

As to duties of clerk of supreme court with respect to attorneys-at-law, see ch. 5 of title 33.

As to acknowledgment of conveyances and forms thereof, see §

34-1-113

et seq.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

15A Am. Jur. 2d Clerks of Court § 1 et seq.

21 C.J.S. Courts §§ 236 to 265.

§ 5-2-201.
Duties generally.

The clerk of the supreme
court shall be subject to and perform the duties, prescribed for him
by the supreme court, and as or may be prescribed by law. He shall
collect in advance, all fees hereinafter enumerated to be paid for
his services as such officer.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 51, § 1; 1895, ch. 43, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 3393; C.S. 1910, § 891; C.S. 1920, § 1120; R.S. 1931, § 31-117; C.S. 1945, § 1-201; Laws 1957, ch. 149, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 5-23.

Cited

in

Conway v. Skidmore, 49 Wyo. 59, 52 P.2d 1235,

1935 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(1935).

§ 5-2-202.
Collection of fees.

The clerk of the supreme court shall collect the following fees from the plaintiff in error or appellant, or in case of an original proceeding the plaintiff or relator shall, at the time of filing the petition in error or record on appeal or when commencing the cause in this court, the sum of seventy-five dollars ($75.00). At the time of filing, the clerk also shall collect a court automation fee in the amount of fifty-five dollars ($55.00) which shall be deposited into the judicial systems automation account established by W.S.

5-2-120

, and an indigent civil legal services fee in the amount of ten dollars ($10.00) which shall be deposited into the indigent civil legal services account established by W.S.

5-2-121

. Other fees or charges to be assessed within the clerk’s office are to be determined under rules of the supreme court.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 51, § 2; 1895, ch. 43, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 3415; C.S. 1910, § 893; Laws 1919, ch. 104, § 1; C.S. 1920, § 1122; R.S. 1931, § 31-119; C.S. 1945, § 1-202; Laws 1957, ch. 149, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 5-24; Laws 1978, ch. 2, § 1; 2000, ch. 25, § 2; 2010, ch. 109, § 2; 2017 ch. 105, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2020 ch. 66, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, inserted “and an indigent civil legal services fee in the amount of ten dollars ($10.00) which shall be deposited into the indigent civil legal services account established by W.S.

5-2-121

.”

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, substituted “twenty-five dollars ($25.00)” for “ten dollars ($10.00)” in the second sentence.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, substituted “sum of seventy-five dollars ($75.00)” for “sum of twenty-five dollars ($25.00)” and “amount of fifty-five dollars ($55.00)” for “amount of twenty-five dollars ($25.00).”

Editor's notes. —

This section is a consolidation of Laws 1890-91, ch. 51, § 2, and part of Laws 1895, ch. 48, § 1. Subsequent amendments reenacted the section as consolidated.

Quoted

in

Van Riper v. Odekoven, 2001 WY 58, 26 P.3d 325,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 69

(Wyo. 2001).

§ 5-2-203.
Salary.

The clerk of the supreme
court shall receive an annual salary as provided by law which shall
be paid in monthly installments at the end of each month, and the
auditor shall draw warrants upon the treasurer payable to said clerk
in payment of such salary.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 51, § 3; 1895, ch. 43, § 2; R.S. 1899, § 3414; Laws 1909, ch. 27, § 1; C.S. 1910, § 892; Laws 1915, ch. 139, § 1; 1919, ch. 40, § 11; C.S. 1920, § 1121; Laws 1921, ch. 95, § 17; 1927, ch. 40, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 31-118; Laws 1943, ch. 113, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 1-203; Laws 1949, ch. 65, § 2; 1951, ch. 44, § 29; 1953, ch. 139, § 27; 1957, ch. 157, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 5-25; Laws 1961, ch. 148, § 2; 1963, ch. 116, § 17; 1965, ch. 115, § 2; 1969, ch. 168, § 6.

Cross references. —

As to salary of clerk of the supreme court, see §

9-3-101

.

As to receiving other compensation, see §§

9-3-103

and

9-3-104

.

Repealing clauses. —

Laws 1890-91, ch. 51, § 4, repealed all laws and parts of laws in conflict therewith.

§ 5-2-204.
Oath and bond.

The clerk of the supreme
court shall take oath before one (1) of the justices of said court
prescribed for state officers by the constitution of the state, and
shall give a bond to the state of Wyoming in such sum as shall be
prescribed by the court, which bond shall be for the faithful accounting
for all moneys that shall come into his hands as clerk, and for the
faithful discharge of his duty, and shall be approved by the chief
justice, and filed with the auditor of the state.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 106, § 12; R.S. 1887, § 835; R.S. 1899, § 3394; C.S. 1910, § 894; C.S. 1920, § 1123; R.S. 1931, § 31-120; C.S. 1945, § 1-204; W.S. 1957, § 5-26.

Cross references. —

As to constitutional oath of office, see art. 6, §§ 20 and 21, Wyo. Const.

Editor's notes. —

In its original form, this section provided for the appointment of the clerk by the supreme court and the contents of the oath of the clerk. The provisions were deleted and the section reworded by the 1899 compiler.

§ 5-2-205.
Deputy clerk; appointment; residence requirement; oath; salary.

The clerk of the supreme
court may, by and with the consent of the justices of the supreme
court, or a majority thereof, appoint a deputy clerk, who shall reside
where the supreme court is held. The deputy shall take and subscribe
a like oath with his principal and may perform all the duties of the
office in the name of his principal, and the attestation of the deputy
to all decrees, orders and processes, shall have the same effect and
force as if issued by his principal. The deputy clerk shall receive
an annual salary to be determined by the supreme court which shall
be paid in monthly installments in the same manner as other state
salaries are paid.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 11, § 1; R.S. 1887, § 836; R.S. 1899, § 3395; C.S. 1910, § 895; C.S. 1920, § 1124; R.S. 1931, § 31-121; C.S. 1945, § 1-205; Laws 1951, ch. 7, § 1; 1953, ch. 139, § 2; 1957, ch. 157, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 5-27; Laws 1961, ch. 148, § 3; 1963, ch. 116, § 18; 1965, ch. 115, § 3; 1969, ch. 168, § 7; 1973, ch. 162, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to constitutional oath of office, see art. 6, §§ 20 and 21, Wyo. Const.

As to all state officers being paid fixed and definite salaries, and for duty of officers to pay all fees collected into the proper treasury, see art. 14, §§ 1 and 2, Wyo. Const.

Editor's notes. —

The 1899 compiler substituted “justices of the supreme court” for “judges of the supreme court of the state of Wyoming” in the first sentence and also deleted “of office,” which followed “oath” near the beginning of the second sentence.

§ 5-2-206.
Deputy clerk; appointment to be entered on record; term.

Said appointment shall
be entered on the records of said supreme court, and shall hold good
until revoked, and both appointment and revocation, may be made as
well in vacation as in term time.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 11, § 2; R.S. 1887, § 837; R.S. 1899, § 3396; C.S. 1910, § 896; C.S. 1920, § 1125; R.S. 1931, § 31-122; C.S. 1945, § 1-206; W.S. 1957, § 5-28.

§ 5-2-207.
Deputy clerk; liability of clerk for acts of deputy.

The clerk of the supreme
court shall be liable on his official bond for all the acts of his
deputy as clerk.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 11, § 3; R.S. 1887, § 838; R.S. 1899, § 3397; C.S. 1910, § 897; C.S. 1920, § 1126; R.S. 1931, § 31-123; C.S. 1945, § 1-207; W.S. 1957, § 5-29.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Liability of clerk of court, or his bond, for default and misfeasance of his assistants or deputies, 71 ALR2d 1140.